Hawaii, session 2026, GM7.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. This Act is recommended by the governor for
immediate passage in accordance with section 9 of article VII of
the Constitution of the State of Hawaii.
PART II
SECTION 2. There are appropriated from the sources of
funding indicated below to collective bargaining statewide
(BUF 102) the following sums or so much thereof as may be
necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 all collective
bargaining cost items in the agreement negotiated with the
exclusive representative of collective bargaining unit (11):
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General funds $218,194 $461,643
Special funds $832,498 $1,761,465
SECTION 3. Funds appropriated by this part shall be
allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate state

Page 2 2272
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROPOSED
departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for
the purposes of this part.
PART III
SECTION 4. There are appropriated from the sources of
funding indicated below to collective bargaining statewide
(BUF 102) the following sums or so much thereof as may be
necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2025 2027 the salary
increases and other cost adjustments authorized by chapter 89C,
Hawaii Revised Statutes, for state officers and employees who
are excluded from collective bargaining and belong to the same
compensation plans as those officers and employees within
bargaining unit ( 11) :
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026 2027
General funds $14,795 $31,046
Special funds $77,099 $161,875
SECTION 5. Funds appropriated by this part shall be
allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate state
departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for
the purposes of this part.
PART IV
SECTION 6. There are appropriated from the source of
funding indicated below to health premium payments (BUF 761) the

Page 3 2272
H.B. NO.
H.D.1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROPOSED
following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund
for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 all collective bargaining cost
items in the agreement negotiated with the exclusive
representative of collective bargaining unit (11):
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General funds $219,746 $433,723
SECTION 7. Funds appropriated by this part shall be
allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate state
departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for
the purposes of this part.
PART V
SECTION 8. There are appropriated from the source of
funding indicated below to health premium payments (BUF 761) the
following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund
for fiscal biennium 2025 2027 the salary increases and other
cost adjustments authorized by chapter 89C, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, for state officers and employees who are excluded from
collective bargaining and belong to the same compensation plans
as those officers and employees within bargaining unit (11):
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General funds $11,300 $22,202

Page4 2272
H.B. NO.
H.D.1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROPOSED
SECTION 9. Funds appropriated by this part shall be
allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate state
departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for
the purposes of this part.
PART VI
SECTION 10. Salary increases and cost adjustments provided
in this Act for any officer or employee whose compensation is
paid, in whole or in part, from federal, special, or other funds
shall be paid wholly or proportionately, as the case may be,
from the respective funds.
SECTION 11. The fiscal year 2025-2026 appropriations or
authorizations under this Act shall not lapse until the end of
fiscal biennium 2025-2027; provided that funds appropriated or
authorized by this Act that are not expended or encumbered by
June 30, 2027, shall lapse as of that date.
SECTION 12. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.